Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-6319.08
Licensed risk assessor, defined.

Licensed risk assessor means an individual who has been trained by an accredited training program and licensed by the department to conduct risk assessments and to sample for the presence of lead in dust and soil for the purposes of abatement clearance testing.

Laws 1999, LB 863, § 10;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 1268.